test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-N-May_2017_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol: Morph
  xerox:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst: Morph
      lookup: App

Tests:

# generated in May 2017 while converting Filosoft lexicon to 2-level formalism
# these words were part of the test cases, checked manually

  Nouns:
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinais-kahinaiski, kihinais-kahinateski, kihinates-kahinaiski]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: [kihinais-kahinais, kihinais-kahinates, kihinates-kahinais]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinaisse-kahinaissegi, kihinaisse-kahinatessegi, kihinatesse-kahinaissegi]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: [kihinaisse-kahinaisse, kihinaisse-kahinatesse, kihinatesse-kahinaisse]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinaist-kahinaistki, kihinaist-kahinatestki, kihinatest-kahinaistki]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: [kihinaist-kahinaist, kihinaist-kahinatest, kihinatest-kahinaist]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinaiks-kahinaikski, kihinaiks-kahinatekski, kihinateks-kahinaikski]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: [kihinaiks-kahinaiks, kihinaiks-kahinateks, kihinateks-kahinaiks]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinail-kahinailgi, kihinail-kahinatelgi, kihinatel-kahinailgi]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: [kihinail-kahinail, kihinail-kahinatel, kihinatel-kahinail]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinailt-kahinailtki, kihinailt-kahinateltki, kihinatelt-kahinailtki]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: [kihinailt-kahinailt, kihinailt-kahinatelt, kihinatelt-kahinailt]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kihinaile-kahinailegi, kihinaile-kahinatelegi, kihinatele-kahinailegi]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: [kihinaile-kahinaile, kihinaile-kahinatele, kihinatele-kahinaile]
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Par: kihinaid-kahinaid
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kihinaid-kahinaidki
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ine: kihinas-kahinas
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kihinas-kahinaski
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ill: kihinasse-kahinasse
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kihinasse-kahinassegi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ela: kihinast-kahinast
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kihinast-kahinastki
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Nom: kihinad-kahinad
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kihinad-kahinadki
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Tra: kihinaks-kahinaks
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kihinaks-kahinakski
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ade: kihinal-kahinal
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kihinal-kahinalgi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Abl: kihinalt-kahinalt
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kihinalt-kahinaltki
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+All: kihinale-kahinale
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kihinale-kahinalegi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Par: kihinat-kahinat
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kihinat-kahinatki
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ine: kihinates-kahinates
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kihinates-kahinateski
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ill: kihinatesse-kahinatesse
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kihinatesse-kahinatessegi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ela: kihinatest-kahinatest
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kihinatest-kahinatestki
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Tra: kihinateks-kahinateks
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kihinateks-kahinatekski
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ade: kihinatel-kahinatel
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kihinatel-kahinatelgi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Abl: kihinatelt-kahinatelt
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kihinatelt-kahinateltki
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+All: kihinatele-kahinatele
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kihinatele-kahinatelegi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Abe: kihinate-kahinateta
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kihinate-kahinatetagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Com: kihinate-kahinatega
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kihinate-kahinategagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ess: kihinate-kahinatena
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kihinate-kahinatenagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Trm: kihinate-kahinateni
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kihinate-kahinatenigi
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Gen: kihinate-kahinate
    kihin-kahin+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kihinate-kahinategi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Abe: kihina-kahinata
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kihina-kahinatagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Com: kihina-kahinaga
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kihina-kahinagagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ess: kihina-kahinana
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kihina-kahinanagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Trm: kihina-kahinani
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kihina-kahinanigi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Gen: kihina-kahina
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kihina-kahinagi
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Nom: kihin-kahin
    kihin-kahin+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kihin-kahingi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Par: embasid-kumbasid
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: embasid-kumbasidki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ine: embades-kumbades
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: embades-kumbadeski
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ill: embadesse-kumbadesse
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: embadesse-kumbadessegi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ela: embadest-kumbadest
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: embadest-kumbadestki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Tra: embadeks-kumbadeks
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: embadeks-kumbadekski
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ade: embadel-kumbadel
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: embadel-kumbadelgi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Abl: embadelt-kumbadelt
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: embadelt-kumbadeltki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+All: embadele-kumbadele
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: embadele-kumbadelegi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Abe: embade-kumbadeta
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: embade-kumbadetagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Com: embade-kumbadega
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: embade-kumbadegagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ess: embade-kumbadena
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: embade-kumbadenagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Trm: embade-kumbadeni
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: embade-kumbadenigi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Gen: embade-kumbade
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: embade-kumbadegi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Par: emba-kumba
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: emba-kumbagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill: emba-kumba
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: emba-kumbagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Nom: emb-kumb
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: emb-kumbki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [embi-kumbasidki, embi-kumbigi, embasid-kumbigi]
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: [embi-kumbasid, embi-kumbi, embasid-kumbi]
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ine: emmas-kummas
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: emmas-kummaski
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Hyp: [emmasse-kummassegi, emmasse-kumbagi, emba-kummassegi]
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: [emmasse-kummasse, emmasse-kumba, emba-kummasse]
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ela: emmast-kummast
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: emmast-kummastki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Nom: emmad-kummad
    emb-kumb+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: emmad-kummadki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Tra: emmaks-kummaks
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: emmaks-kummakski
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ade: emmal-kummal
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: emmal-kummalgi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Abl: emmalt-kummalt
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: emmalt-kummaltki
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+All: emmale-kummale
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: emmale-kummalegi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Abe: emma-kummata
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: emma-kummatagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Com: emma-kummaga
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: emma-kummagagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ess: emma-kummana
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: emma-kummanagi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Trm: emma-kummani
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: emma-kummanigi
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Gen: emma-kumma
    emb-kumb+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: emma-kummagi
